Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2132
Utilities district; water; sale; cities and villages; sections; effect.

Notwithstanding any provisions of law applicable to cities, villages, and metropolitan utilities districts to the contrary, sections 14-2128 to 14-2132 shall be deemed to be an act complete within itself, to cover the entire subject to which it relates, and to be an independent act.

Laws 1965, c. 79, § 3, p. 315;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1113;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 32.